Maine, session 132, LD895.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA c. 433 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 433
IMMERSIVE OUTDOOR EDUCATION
Page 1 - 132LR1449(03)

§5301. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Fund. "Fund" means the Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program Fund
established within the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service in section 5304.
2. Immersive outdoor education. "Immersive outdoor education" means
experiential, holistic and interdisciplinary education that uses the outdoor setting to engage
students in educational opportunities about the outdoors and natural resources industries
and supports the health and wellness of students.
3. Outdoor education program provider. "Outdoor education program provider"
means an organization that offers immersive outdoor education.
4. Program. "Program" means the Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program
established by the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service pursuant to section
5302.
§5302. Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program
1. Program established. The University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service
shall establish and administer the Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program to
support immersive outdoor education and to assist school administrative units in partnering
with outdoor education programs.
2. Grant requirements. Beginning in school year 2025-2026, except as otherwise
provided in section 5304, the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service shall
provide grants to implement the program in order to assist school administrative units in
partnering with outdoor education program providers. Grants under the program must be:
A. Distributed to an outdoor education program provider that meets the requirements
of section 5303;
B. Used to serve publicly funded students enrolled in grade 4 to grade 8 in schools
operated by tribal school committees or students enrolled in grade 4 to grade 8 in
publicly funded schools in the State, as determined by the sending school
administrative unit and the outdoor education program provider based on community
needs and the curriculum. A student receiving home-school instruction is eligible to
participate in the program as provided by Title 20-A, section 5021. For purposes of
this paragraph, "publicly funded school" means a school required to participate in the
system of learning results established in Title 20-A, section 6209;
C. Provided to the same school grade each year to ensure that students in subsequent
years have an opportunity to participate in the program; and
D. If program funds are limited, prioritized for schools and communities that are
historically underserved by outdoor education, including, but not limited to, Indian
tribes and nations, migrant students, schools with high numbers of students who qualify
for free and reduced-price lunches, rural and remote schools, students in alternative
education programs, students of color, English language learner students and students
receiving special education services.
§5303. Outdoor education program provider requirements
Page 2 - 132LR1449(03)

This section governs the requirements for outdoor education program providers.
1. Program curricula. The program must:
A. Use the outdoors and local ecosystems as the primary context to support hands-on
learning, including lessons, meals and on-site living;
B. Engage students in safe and age-appropriate activities;
C. Focus on the State's outdoor heritage, science, engineering, technology,
mathematics, health, environment and natural resources and sustainability by including
a strong academic component that supports overall academic achievement and career
trajectories and connects science with other subjects to support students' understanding
of:
(1) Conserving and developing marine and estuarine resources;
(2) Conducting scientific research;
(3) Promoting the State's coastal fishing industries;
(4) Protecting and managing fish, game and other wildlife and their habitats,
including restoring endangered species;
(5) Promoting agriculture, conservation, forestry, land management and the well-
being of domestic animals;
(6) Safely enjoying the outdoors; and
(7) Promoting public health;
D. Develop students' social and emotional skills, including teamwork, citizenship, self-
awareness and community responsibility;
E. Support students' health and wellness by developing an appreciation for education
and recreation in the outdoors;
F. Encourage hands-on engagement, observation, discovery, intellectual curiosity and
problem-solving; and
G. Support students and teachers to combat the learning loss associated with the
COVID-19 pandemic.
2. Program structure. An outdoor education program provider shall:
A. Comply with the requirements of chapter 927 regarding licensed guides, youth
camp trip leaders or educational trip leaders, as appropriate.
B. Provide outdoor programs for a 2-night, 3-day experience or day programs when
overnight programs are impractical due to health or cultural considerations;
C. Pursue a sustainable funding model;
D. Collaborate with schools and teachers to provide access to the program;
E. Pledge to provide equitable access to the program to all students;
F. Train educators in educational strategies and field work;
G. Develop and participate in an evaluation program in accordance with section 5305;
and
Page 3 - 132LR1449(03)

H. Promote high levels of accessibility for students with disabilities.
§5304. Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program Fund
1. Fund established. The Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program Fund is
established within the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service. The University
of Maine Cooperative Extension Service shall administer grant funds for the program in
accordance with subsection 2. The fund is nonlapsing and may be invested in the same
manner as permitted for the investment of other state funds.
2. Use of fund. For school year 2025-2026 and each school year thereafter, the
University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service shall determine the funding needed for
the program. The funding must be sufficient for students in all geographic regions of the
State to participate in the program for a 2-night, 3-day experience.
3. Sources of fund. The State Controller shall credit to the fund:
A. All money appropriated or allocated by the Legislature for inclusion in the fund;
B. Money from any other source, whether public or private, designated for deposit into
or credited to the fund; and
C. Interest earned or other investment income on balances in the fund.
The University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service may use funds for staff and
for administrative costs associated with administering grant funds for the program. The
University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service is not required to provide grants under
section 5302, develop an evaluation and longitudinal study under section 5305, convene an
advisory committee under section 5306 or undertake any other work or provide any other
services for which it does not have sufficient funding.
§5305. Report; evaluation
Except as otherwise provided in section 5304, the University of Maine Cooperative
Extension Service, in consultation with the advisory committee under section 5306, shall
develop an evaluation and longitudinal study on current and future demographics of
students participating in the program for the purpose of ensuring equitable access and to
understand the effects of outdoor education on emotional, educational and career
trajectories of students who have participated in the program. Beginning March 1, 2026
and annually thereafter, the University of Maine Cooperative Extension Service shall
submit a report regarding the study to the joint standing committees of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over education matters, inland fisheries and wildlife matters and
agriculture, conservation and forestry matters. The report must include an emphasis on
information regarding the accessibility of the program from a geographic, economic, ethnic
and disability perspective and the program's effect on state workforce goals.
§5306. Advisory committee
Except as otherwise provided in section 5304, the University of Maine Cooperative
Extension Service shall convene an advisory committee for the purpose of advising and
making recommendations regarding the program and seeking new opportunities to ensure
that the State is a nationwide leader in outdoor education, including high school education
career training programs. In inviting members onto the advisory committee, the University
of Maine Cooperative Extension Service shall take into consideration geographic and
demographic diversity in membership and ensure that membership of the committee
Page 4 - 132LR1449(03)

includes a youth advocate and representatives of all applicable state agencies, the outdoor
education program provider community, the natural resources community and upper
elementary and middle school education.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Outdoor School for All Maine Students Program Fund N427
Initiative: Provides base allocations to authorize expenditures for the University of Maine
Cooperative Extension Service's administration of the Outdoor School for All Maine
Students Program in the event that funds from public or private sources are received.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 5 - 132LR1449(03)